Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 1

General Provisions

27-1-101 — 27-1-112.
[Reserved.]

In all cases tried on the facts in a chancery court and afterwards brought for review to the court of appeals, the court of appeals shall, to the extent that the facts are not stipulated or are not concluded by the findings of the jury, make and file written findings of fact, which thereupon shall become a part of the record. Before any such findings shall become final, reasonable opportunity shall be afforded the parties to examine the findings and to ask for different or additional findings. Where there has been a concurrent finding of the master and chancellor, which under the principles now obtaining is binding on the appellate courts, the court of appeals shall not have the right to disturb such finding. To the extent that the findings of the chancery court and the court of appeals concur, they shall, if there be any evidence to support them, be conclusive upon any review of the facts in the supreme court; to the extent that they do not concur, they shall be open to examination in that court. The court of appeals shall not be limited to the consideration of such facts as were found or requested in the lower court, but it shall independently consider and find all material facts in the record; and either party, whether appellant or not, may assign error on the failure of the chancellor to find any material fact, without regard to whether such fact was found or requested in the lower court. This shall not apply to any case tried in the chancery court upon oral testimony.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 6325a12; Acts 1927, ch. 68, § 1; Code 1932, § 10620; Acts 1972, ch. 565, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-113.

Cross-References. Findings by the court and amendment thereof, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 52.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 671, 674, 701.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 121, 122, 217; 5 Tenn. Juris., Children Born out of Wedlock, § 16; 9 Tenn. Juris., Dismissal, Discontinuance, and Nonsuit, §§ 7, 25; 12 Tenn. Juris., Exceptions, Bill of, § 6; 21 Tenn. Juris., Reference and Commissioners, § 18; 24 Tenn. Juris., Verdict, § 24.

Law Reviews.

Appeal and Error — Questions for the Jury, 21 Tenn. L. Rev. 771.

Procedure and Evidence — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1144.

“Seeking Justice on Appeal,” 27 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 28 (1991).

Suggested Changes in Appellate Procedure, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 220.

The Theoretical Foundations of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, I. Introduction (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 162.

The Theoretical Foundations of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, III. Some Noteworthy Features of the Rules (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 180.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Trial Tactics in Tennessee (John A. Chambliss), 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 450.

27-1-114. Filing of findings.

The court of appeals shall file its findings at the same time that it renders its decision. It shall be the duty of chancellors, except where the findings are or have been incorporated in the decree as above provided, to file their findings of fact within thirty (30) days after appeal; and the clerk shall then give notice thereof to the parties or their counsel, who shall have the right by petition to ask for different or additional findings; and, if no such petition shall be filed within five (5) days after such notice, unless the time shall be extended by order of the court, the findings shall not be further questioned in that court; provided, that the time in which such petition may be filed shall in no event be less than five (5) days from the taking of an appeal. For the purposes stated, the cause shall remain in the chancery court even after the appeal has been taken. The same rules and practice shall govern with respect to cases tried on the facts in courts exercising the former jurisdictions of county courts and thence brought directly to the court of appeals. The provisions as to a finding of facts shall not apply where, before it is made up, the judge who tried the case has died or has gone out of office, and in such case the clerk shall include in the record a certificate to that effect.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 6325a12; mod. Code 1932, § 10621; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-114; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 3(d).

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 671.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 96, 121, 122, 223; 16 Tenn. Juris., Exceptions, Bill of, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Suggested Changes in Appellate Procedure, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 220.

27-1-115 — 27-1-117.
[Reserved.]

The judges of the supreme court shall give written opinions, stating the points of law on which the action of the court is based, in all cases determined by them, except actions in which there is no defense.

Code 1858, § 3931 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 60, § 2); Shan., § 5735; Code 1932, § 9924; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-120.

27-1-119. Opinions furnished to counsel.

The members of the supreme court, the court of appeals and court of criminal appeals for each division of the state shall immediately, on announcement of the opinion of the court in any case before it, mail a copy of the opinion filed by the court in each case decided in such court to counsel of record for each of the parties thereto.

Where more than one (1) person shall appear as counsel of record for one (1) party, or where one (1) or more persons shall appear as counsel for more than one (1) party, then only one (1) copy of the opinion shall be mailed.

If the court so desires, it may deliver such copies to the clerk of the court, who shall mail such copies to counsel of record, the mailing fees to be taxed as a part of the costs of the cause.

Acts 1943, ch. 74, §§ 1, 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 9924.1, 10629.1 (Williams, §§ 9924.1, 9924.2); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-121; modified.

Law Reviews.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, VII. Disposition of Appeals (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 90.

27-1-120. Reasons for reversal furnished trial court.

If the judgment of the inferior court is reversed and the cause remanded, the judges shall file, in writing, with the clerk, the reasons of reversal, and the points of law in the judgment of the inferior court in which the error existed, to be copied by the clerk, and certified to the inferior court as part of the record of reversal.

Code 1858, § 3932 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 60, § 1); Shan., § 5736; Code 1932, § 9925; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-122.

Law Reviews.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, VII. Disposition of Appeals (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 90.

27-1-121. Appeals judges excused from attendance at announcement of decisions.

When cases are heard and determined by judges of the court of appeals and court of criminal appeals who do not reside in the grand division in which the cases arose and were heard, it shall not be necessary for such judges to be present in person when decisions in such cases are announced; and it shall be lawful for the minutes containing the judgments or decrees in such cases to be signed by the judges residing in the grand division in which such cases arose and were heard or tried.

A written opinion and findings signed by the judges who heard and determined the case shall be filed with the clerk of the court before the judgment or decree is entered.

The judgments and decrees so entered and authenticated shall be, in all respects, as valid as if they were authenticated by the signatures, to the minutes, of the judges rendering them.

Acts 1929, ch. 95, §§ 1, 2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10623, 10624; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-123; modified.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

27-1-122. Damages for frivolous appeal.

When it appears to any reviewing court that the appeal from any court of record was frivolous or taken solely for delay, the court may, either upon motion of a party or of its own motion, award just damages against the appellant, which may include, but need not be limited to, costs, interest on the judgment, and expenses incurred by the appellee as a result of the appeal.

Acts 1975, ch. 203, § 1; T.C.A., § 27-124.

Cross-References. Frivolous appeals, workers' compensation cases, §50-6-225.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 41.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 5, 268; 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, VII. Appellate Review of the Disposition (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 366.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, VIII. Practice on Appeal (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 102.

Workers' Compensation Outline (Paul Campbell III), 18 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1982).

27-1-123. Notice of appeal not jurisdictional.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule of court to the contrary, in all criminal cases the “notice of appeal” document is not jurisdictional and the filing of such document may be waived in the interests of justice. The appropriate appellate court shall be the court that determines whether such a waiver is in the interests of justice.

Acts 1983, ch. 417, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.16.

Law Reviews.

Failure to Timely File Notice of Appeal for First Tier Appellate Review: A Client's Rights, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 483 (1984).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

27-1-124. Stay of execution — Bond required in civil matters.

If a plaintiff in a civil action obtains a judgment under any legal theory, the amount of the appeal bond necessary to stay execution during the course of all appeals or discretionary reviews of that judgment by any appellate court shall not exceed the lesser of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the judgment amount.

For purposes of determining the amount of the required bond, the court shall not include punitive or exemplary damages in the judgment amount.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), if a party proves by a preponderance of the evidence that an appellant is dissipating assets outside the ordinary course of business to avoid payment of a judgment, a court may enter orders that are necessary to protect the appellee and establish the bond amount, which may include any punitive or exemplary damages.

If the appellant establishes by clear and convincing evidence at a post judgment hearing that the cost of the bond and the obligation resulting from the surety's payment of the bond in an amount authorized by this section will render the appellant insolvent, the court shall establish a security in an amount, and other terms and conditions it deems proper, that would allow the appeal of the judgment to proceed, without resulting in the appellant's insolvency. This subsection (d) should be narrowly construed.

If this section is found to be in conflict with any rules prescribed by the supreme court, this section shall apply notwithstanding § 16-3-406.

Acts 2003, ch. 276, § 1; 2011, ch. 510, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 276, § 2 provided that the act shall apply to all cases pending on or filed on or after June 4, 2003.

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Civil Justice Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24 provided that the act, which rewrote this section, shall apply to all liability actions for injuries, deaths and losses covered by the act which accrue on or after October 1, 2011.

27-1-125. Appeal from an order of a trial court granting or denying class action certification.

The court of appeals shall hear appeals from orders of trial courts granting or denying class certification under Rule 23 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, if a notice is filed within ten (10) days after entry of the order. All proceedings in the trial court shall be automatically stayed pending the appeal of the class certification ruling.

Acts 2005, ch. 280, § 1; 2011, ch. 510, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 280, § 2 provided that this section shall apply to all cases pending on or filed on or after July 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Civil Justice Act of 2011.”

Acts 2011, ch. 510, § 24 provided that the act, which rewrote this section, shall apply to all liability actions for injuries, deaths and losses covered by this act which accrue on or after October 1, 2011.

Law Reviews.

Mass Tort — Class Action Certification — The Unavailability of Class Certification under the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act and the Appropriateness of Class Claims Alleging Common Law Fraud and Misrepresentation in Tennessee (Sarah-Katherine Adams Wright), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 491 (2009).

27-1-113. Findings of fact — Scope of review.

27-1-118. Written opinions in supreme court.